California, session 20252026, AB334.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 27565 of the Streets and Highways Code is amended to read:27565. (a) The department, in cooperation with the district and all known entities planning to implement a toll facility in this state, shall develop and adopt functional specifications and standards for an automatic vehicle identification system, in compliance with all of the following objectives:(1) In order to be detected, a driver shall not be required to reduce speed below the applicable speed for the type of facility being used.(2) A vehicle owner shall not be required to purchase or install more than one device to use on all toll facilities, but may be required to have a separate account or financial arrangement for the use of these facilities.(3) A facility operator shall have the ability to select from different manufacturers and vendors. The specifications and standards shall encourage multiple bidders, and shall not have the effect of limiting a facility operator to choosing a system that is able to be supplied by only one manufacturer or vendor.(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), an automatic vehicle identification system purchased or installed after January 1, 1991, shall comply with the specifications and standards adopted pursuant to subdivision (a).(c) Subdivision (b) does not apply to an interim automatic vehicle identification system for which a contract is entered into between an entity planning to implement a toll facility and the supplier of the interim system before January 1, 1994, if both of the following requirements are met:(1) The department has made a written determination that the installation and operation of the interim system will expedite the completion of the toll facility and its opening to public use.(2) The entity planning to implement the toll facility has entered into an agreement with the department to install, within five years after any portion of the toll facility is opened for public use, an automatic vehicle identification system meeting the specifications and standards adopted pursuant to subdivision (a).(d) The automated vehicle identification system developed by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be capable of identifying various types of vehicles, including, but not limited to, commercial vehicles.(e) (1) On and after the date specified in the federal Moving Ahead for Progress in the 21st Century Act (Public Law 112-141) for implementation of interoperability of electronic toll collection on federal-aid highways, operators of toll facilities on federal-aid highways may fully implement technologies or business practices that provide for the interoperability of electronic toll collection programs consistent with federal law. Operators of toll facilities on(2) (A) Subject to subparagraphs (B), (C), and (D), an operator of a toll facility on federal-aid highways engaged in an interstate interoperability program may provide to an out-of-state toll agency or interstate interoperability tolling hub only the following information regarding a vehicle’s use of the toll facility that is within the following categories and that is required to implement interstate interoperability, as established by the data types in the National Interoperability Interface Control Document Version 2.0, or a successor version, that is published by the National Interoperability Committee, and shall otherwise comply with all federal and state privacy protection laws, including, but not limited to, Section 31490: facility:(A)(i) License plate data.(B)(ii) Transponder data.(C)(iii) Transaction data. data, which may include any of the following:(D)(I) Acknowledgment data.(E)(II) Correction data.(F)(III) Reconciliation data.(2)Notwithstanding paragraph (1), operators of a toll facility on federal-aid highways shall not provide biometric information, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1798.140 of the Civil Code, as part of implementing interstate interoperability.(B) The operator of a toll facility on a federal-aid state highway may provide information listed in subparagraph (A) only if it is listed as a “required” field within the National Interoperability Interface Control Document Version 2.0 as it was in effect on July 1, 2025.(C) Notwithstanding subdivision (h) of Section 31490, to the extent an operator of a toll facility on a federal-aid highway needs to collect information in addition to the information set forth in subparagraph (B) to implement interstate interoperability without transmitting the information, that collection shall be governed by subdivision (a) of Section 31490.(D) Notwithstanding subdivision (h) of Section 31490, if an operator of a toll facility on a federal-aid highway engaged in an interstate interoperability program provides to an out-of-state toll agency or an interstate interoperability tolling hub or collects information beyond what is permitted by this paragraph, the transmission shall be deemed a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 31490.(3) A transportation agency that participates in interstate interoperability shall post on its internet website the data types required to implement interstate interoperability, as established in the National Interoperability Interface Control Document Version 2.0, or a successor version, 2.0 that is published by the National Interoperability Committee.(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2035, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 27565 is added to the Streets and Highways Code, to read:27565. (a) The department, in cooperation with the district and all known entities planning to implement a toll facility in this state, shall develop and adopt functional specifications and standards for an automatic vehicle identification system, in compliance with all of the following objectives:(1) In order to be detected, a driver shall not be required to reduce speed below the applicable speed for the type of facility being used.(2) A vehicle owner shall not be required to purchase or install more than one device to use on all toll facilities, but may be required to have a separate account or financial arrangement for the use of these facilities.(3) A facility operator shall have the ability to select from different manufacturers and vendors. The specifications and standards shall encourage multiple bidders, and shall not have the effect of limiting a facility operator to choosing a system that is able to be supplied by only one manufacturer or vendor.(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), an automatic vehicle identification system purchased or installed after January 1, 1991, shall comply with the specifications and standards adopted pursuant to subdivision (a).(c) Subdivision (b) does not apply to an interim automatic vehicle identification system for which a contract is entered into between an entity planning to implement a toll facility and the supplier of the interim system before January 1, 1994, if both of the following requirements are met:(1) The department has made a written determination that the installation and operation of the interim system will expedite the completion of the toll facility and its opening to public use.(2) The entity planning to implement the toll facility has entered into an agreement with the department to install, within five years after any portion of the toll facility is opened for public use, an automatic vehicle identification system meeting the specifications and standards adopted pursuant to subdivision (a).(d) The automated vehicle identification system developed by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be capable of identifying various types of vehicles, including, but not limited to, commercial vehicles.(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2035.